District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19

Establishment of the donor registry.

There is established a donor registry for residents of the District of Columbia, which shall be maintained by the federally designated organ procurement organization serving the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20, 55 DCR 2532

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.01 and § 7-1531.19f.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 20 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).